Missouri, session 2026, SB1658.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 301, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 301.287, to read as
follows:
301.287. 1. This section shall be known and referred
to as "Mason's Law".
2. Beginning January 1, 2027, a resident of this state
with a health condition or disability that limits or impairs
the ability to effectively communicate with law enforcement
may, at the time of motor vehicle registration, apply to the
department of revenue for a designation that shall be
associated with the person's motor vehicle license plate
number and available to law enforcement under the Missouri
uniform law enforcement system (MULES) established under
chapter 43.
3. The initial application, which shall be on a form
prescribed by the department and made available on the
department's website, shall be signed by a physician
licensed under chapter 334, or a psychologist licensed under
chapter 337, certifying that:

SB 1658 2
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or
spouse has a physical or mental health condition that is
likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate with
law enforcement; and
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that
the applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse
will have the communication impairment for at least five
years.
4. Upon submission of an application and approval by
the department, the department shall notify the Missouri
state highway patrol of the resident's approved application
and the highway patrol shall prepare an entry in the
Missouri uniform law enforcement system (MULES) that
indicates that the applicant or the applicant's child,
parent, or spouse has a physical or mental health condition
that may impair the ability to effectively communicate with
law enforcement. Such entry shall remain active for a
period of five years, unless the applicant requests that
such designation be removed from the system. Upon
expiration of the five-year period, the designation in MULES
may be reactivated upon the filing of a renewal form with
the department signed by a physician licensed under chapter
334, or a psychologist licensed under chapter 337,
certifying that:
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or
spouse has a physical or mental health condition that is
likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate with
law enforcement; and
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that
the applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse
will have the communication impairment for at least five
years.

SB 1658 3
5. The department of public safety shall issue
guidance and education materials to all law enforcement
agencies in this state to promote awareness of the
designation established under this section.
6. The department of revenue may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓